Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.080

Employees of commission.

The commission shall appoint by a majority vote a city clerk and such other officers and employees as the commission may by ordinance provide. Any officer or employee appointed by the commission may be discharged at any time by vote of a majority of the members of the commission. Any commissioner may perform any duties pertaining to his or her department but without additional compensation therefor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2016; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.080. Prior: 1943 c 25 s 3, part; 1911 c 116 s 12, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9101, part.]